Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Cross references. —

For provision providing that AS

26.05.360

— 25.05.990 “apply to offenses occurring on or after August 7, 2016”, see sec. 11, ch. 55, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to this chapter by ch. 85, SLA 2018, see sec. 42, ch. 85, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 26.05.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, a person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused;

“arrest” means the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing the person to remain within certain specified limits;

“cadet,” “candidate,” or “midshipman” means a person who is enrolled in or attending a state military academy, a regional training institute, or any other formal education program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned officer in the militia of the state;

“classified information” means

information or material that has been determined by an official of the United States or any state under law, an executive order, or regulation to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national or state security; and

restricted data, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 2014(y) (Atomic Energy Act of 1954);

“code of military justice” means the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted by the adjutant general to implement this chapter;

“commanding officer” or “commander” includes only commissioned officers of the militia of the state and includes officers in charge only when administering a nonjudicial punishment under the code of military justice;

“confinement” means the physical restraint of a person;

“controlled substance” means

opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana;

a compound or derivative of a substance specified in (A) of this paragraph;

a substance not specified in (A) or (B) of this paragraph that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the President of the United States for the purposes of the armed forces of the United States under 10 U.S.C. 801 — 946 (Uniform Code of Military Justice);

a substance not specified in (A) or (B) of this paragraph or on a list prescribed by the President under (C) of this paragraph that is listed in 21 U.S.C. 812, schedules I through V;

an illicit synthetic drug identified in AS

17.21.010

;

“convening authority” includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being or a successor in command to the convening authority;

“day” means calendar day and is not synonymous with the term “unit training assembly”;

“department” means the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

“enlisted member” means a person in an enlisted grade;

“military court” means a court-martial;

“military judge” means an official of a general or special court-martial described under AS

26.05.470

;

“militia” or “militia of the state” means the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, and the Alaska State Defense Force;

“national or state security” means the national defense and foreign relations of the United States;

“officer” means a commissioned or warrant officer;

“officer in charge” means a member of the naval militia, United States Navy, United States Marine Corps, or United States Coast Guard designated by the appropriate authority;

“record,” when used in connection with the proceedings of a court-martial, means

an official written transcript, written summary, or other writing relating to the proceedings; or

an official audiotape, videotape, digital image or file, or similar material from which sound, or sound and visual images, depicting the proceedings may be reproduced;

“reviewing authority” means the Military Appeals Commission and the Alaska supreme court;

“senior force judge advocate” means the senior judge advocate of the commander of the same force of the militia of the state as the accused and who is that commander’s chief legal advisor;

“unit” means a regularly organized body of the militia of the state not larger than a company, a squadron, a division of the naval militia, or a body corresponding to one of them.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 39 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.900

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Paragraph (8) was enacted as (22); renumbered in 2018, at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (22) [now (8)].

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.